Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 514.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft by deception when the person obtains property or services of another by deception
with intent to deprive the person thereof. A person deceives when the person intentionally:
(a) Creates or reinforces a false impression, including false impressions as to law, value, intention, or other
state of mind;
(b) Prevents another from acquiring information which would affect judgment of a transaction;
(c) Fails to correct a false impression which the deceiver previously created or reinforced or which the
deceiver knows to be influencing another to whom the person stands in a fiduciary or confidential
relationship;
(d) Fails to disclose a known lien, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of property
which the person transfers or encumbers in consideration for the property obtained, whether the
impediment is or is not valid or is or is not a matter of official record; or
(e) Issues or passes a check or similar sight order for the payment of money, knowing that it will not be
honored by the drawee.
(2) The term "deceive" does not, however, include falsity as to matters having no pecuniary significance or
puffing by statements unlikely to deceive ordinary persons in the group addressed.
(3) Deception as to a person's intention to perform a promise shall not be inferred from the fact alone that he or
she did not subsequently perform the promise.
(4) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section:[, ]
(a) A person is presumed to create or reinforce a false impression when the person lists or advertises
residential or commercial real property or vacant land for sale, lease, or rent without legal title or
authority; and
(b) A maker of a check or similar sight order for the payment of money is presumed to know that the check
or order, other than a postdated check or order, would not be paid, if:
1.[(a)] The maker had no account with the drawee at the time the check or order was issued; or
2.[(b)] Payment was refused by the drawee for lack of funds, upon presentation within thirty (30) days
after issue, and the maker failed to make good within ten (10) days after receiving notice of that
refusal. Notice of the refusal may include a citation to this section and a description of this
section's criminal penalties and shall be deemed properly addressed when mailed to the address
printed or written on the check or sight order or provided by the drawer or maker upon issuance
of the check or sight order. The notice, if mailed, shall be deemed received by the addressee
seven (7) days after it is placed in the United States mail. The notice may be sent by first-class
mail if supported by an affidavit of service setting out the contents of the notice, the address to
which the notice was mailed, that correct postage was applied, and the date the notice was placed
in the United States mail. A maker makes good on a check or similar sight order for the payment
of money by paying to the holder the face amount of the instrument, together with any
merchant's posted bad check handling fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) and any fee imposed
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If a county attorney issues notice to a maker that a drawee has refused to honor an instrument due to a lack of
funds as described in subsection (4)(b)2. of this section, the county attorney may charge a fee to the maker of
fifty dollars ($50), if the instrument is paid. Money paid to the county attorney pursuant to this section shall be
used only for payment of county attorney office operating expenses.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) A person is guilty of theft by deception when the person issues a check or similar sight order in payment of all
or any part of any tax payable to the Commonwealth knowing that it will not be honored by the drawee.
(7) A person is guilty of theft by deception when the person issues a check or similar sight order in payment of all
or any part of a child support obligation knowing that it will not be honored by the drawee.
(8) Theft by deception is a Class B misdemeanor unless:
(a) The value of the property, service, or the amount of the check or sight order referred to in subsection (6)
or (7) of this section is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000),
in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;
(b) The value of the property, service, or the amount of the check or sight order referred to in subsection (6)
or (7) of this section is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;
(c) A person has three (3) or more convictions under paragraph (a) of this subsection within the last five (5)
years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on
which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of convictions were entered;
(d) The value of the property, service, or the amount of the check or sight order referred to in subsection (6)
or (7) of this section is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony;[:] or
(e) The offense occurs during a declared emergency as defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or
man-made disaster, within the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster, in which case the person shall be charged one (1) level higher than the level otherwise
specified in this subsection.
(9) If any person commits two (2) or more separate offenses of theft by deception within ninety (90) days, the
offenses may be combined and treated as a single offense, and the value of the property in each offense may be
aggregated for the purpose of determining the appropriate charge.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.